Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.230

State agencies and educational institutions—Fees.

The office may charge to a state agency and educational institutions, as both are defined in RCW 39.19.020, a reasonable fee or other appropriate charge, to be set by rule adopted by the office under chapter 34.05 RCW, based upon the state agency's or educational institution's expenditure level of funds subject to the office.

[ 1993 c 195 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date of 1993 c 195—1993 sp.s. c 24: See note following RCW 39.19.200.